packages/search/tsearch2/dict/greek/el_GR.utf8.aff
flag *n:
	 ύ ς		>	-ύς,ιοί	    # βαθύς > βαθιοί
	 ώ		>	-ώ,είτε	    # αγαπηθώ > αγαπηθείτε
         ο ς            >       -ος,ο           # δρόμος > δρόμο
