packages/search/tsearch2/dict/greek/el_GR.utf8.dict
Ήφαιστος/n
Αίγυπτος/n
Αδαμόπουλος/dn
Αλέκος/Idn
Αλιβιεράτος/n
Αναγνωστόπουλος/dn
Αντωνόπουλος/dkn
Αργυρόπουλος/dn
Βαγγελάτος/dn
Βενιζέλος/den
Γιάννος/IXdn
Γώγος/Qdekn
Δημόκριτος/n
Δώρος/dn
Ευλάμπιος/n
Εχέδωρος/n
Ηλιόπουλος/dn
Θάσος/dn
Θεόφραστος/n
Ιανουάριος/n
Κάλυμνος/n
Κλαουδάτος/dn
Κωνσταντίνος/dn
Λάζαρος/dekn
Λέρος/dn
Λουδοβίκος/dn
Μάριος/Qden
Μαρίνος/den
Μελέτιος/dn
Νάξος/dn
Νικόδημος/dn
Ξενόπουλος/dn
Πάφος/dn
Παράσχος/dn
Πολύγυρος/dn
Σάρος/den
Σινόπουλος/dn
Στασινόπουλος/dn
Τήνος/dn
Φεβρουάριος/dn
Φραγκίσκος/dn
Χαράλαμπος/en
Χρήστος/dn
Χρύσανθος/den
άγγελος/ekn
άγονος/IQXdekn
άκαιρος/IXden
άκρος/HIQXden
άλογος/IQXen
άμπελος/n
άνθρωπος/dekn
άξενος/IQXdn
άπρακτος/Xdekn
άρρωστος/IXkn
άστατος/Xden
άτακτος/IQXdn
άτυπος/IQXden
άωτος/Idekn
έγκαιρος/IQXen
έκαστος/IQXden
έκτατος/IQXn
έμμισθος/IQXdjkn
έμπρακτος/IQXen
ένθετος/Idn
έντεχνος/IQXdkn
έξοδος/Ikn
έσπερος/n
έφεδρος/IQdkn
ήμερος/IQXden
ίκαρος/dkn
ίσος/HIQXdejkn
αβοήθητος/QXdkn
αγιογράφος/Qdjn
αγώγιμος/IQXdejkn
αδίστακτος/IQXdn
αδιάφορος/IQXdekn
αδιανέμητος/IQXden
αδύναμος/IQXdekn
αθίγγανος/Qkn
αθώος/IQdejkn
αισιόδοξος/IXdekn
ακάθαρτος/IQdn
ακίνδυνος/IQXden
ακαριαίος/In
ακοινώνητος/n
ακράτητος/Ien
ακτινολόγος/djkn
ακώλυτος/IQXdn
αμειβόμενος/Xdejkn
αμετανόητος/dkn
αμφίβιος/In
ανάλογος/IQXdejkn
ανέκκλητος/IQXekn
ανέφικτος/IQXdkn
ανήφορος/n
αναίτιος/IQdkn
αναγνωριζόμενος/IQXdejkn
αναδασωτέος/IQen
αναιρούμενος/IQXdn
ανακαλούμενος/QXekn
αναμφίβολος/IQXn
αναπαλλοτρίωτος/IQXdn
αναπότρεπτος/IXdn
αναφερθώ/IJKMn
ανεγνωρισμένος/QXdjn
ανεξάρτητος/IQXdejkn
ανεπάγγελτος/IQXn
ανεπαίσθητος/IXen
ανερχόμενος/IQXdejkn
ανθρωποκτόνος/n
ανθυποπλοίαρχος/kn
αντίθετος/IQXdejkn
αντίρροπος/IXdekn
ανταποκρινόμενος/IQXdejkn
αντιπλοίαρχος/n
αντισταθώ/JKMn
ανυπόγραφος/IXdkn
ανώδυνος/IXdn
ανώτατος/IQXdejkn
αξιόλογος/IQXdejkn
απαισιόδοξος/IQXdekn
απαλλασσόμενος/IQXdjkn
απαρασάλευτος/In
απερίσκεπτος/IQXden
απογεγραμμένος/IQn
αποδιδόμενος/IQXdejn
αποκαλούμενος/IQXdekn
απομονωμένος/IQXdekn
απορώ/JKMin
αποτελούντος/IQn
απροκάλυπτος/IXen
απρόσβλητος/IXn
απρόσοδος/IXdn
απόστολος/Qdekn
απόφοιτος/IQXdekn
αριστούχος/Qdjkn
αρχαιότερος/IQXdejkn
ασήμαντος/IQXdekn
ασυμβίβαστος/IQXejkn
ασφαλιστέος/IQdejkn
ασύλληπτος/IXekn
ατιμώρητος/Ikn
αυξημένος/IQXdejkn
αυτοκίνητος/IQdkn
αυτοπρόσωπος/IQXdn
αφαιρετέος/IQdn
αχρησιμοποίητος/QXdn
βάλτος/den
βέβαιος/IQXdjkn
βαθμολογούμενος/IQkn
βαλμένος/n
βαρύτερος/IQXen
βιβλιοθηκάριος/Qdn
βοηθούμενος/IXkn
βραδύτερος/IQXdn
βρόμικος/IXdn
βόρειος/IQdekn
γάτος/Idejn
γεννημένος/IQXdekn
γεωπόνος/Qdjkn
γνώριμος/IQXden
γυναικολόγος/Qdkn
γύρος/IQXdkn
δέσμιος/IQkn
δήμος/Qdejkn
δίοδος/kn
δεδομένος/IQXden
δεσμευμένος/IQXdekn
δεχόμενος/CIQXdekn
δημοσιευμένος/IQXden
διάδοχος/QXkn
διάκοσμος/n
διάστικτος/IXdn
διαγωνιζόμενος/Qdjkn
διαιρούμενος/IXden
διαλαμβανόμενος/IQXdejkn
διανοιγμένος/QXn
διαρθρωμένος/QXden
διατεταγμένος/IXdn
διατιθέμενος/IQXdkn
διαφοροποιούμενος/IXkn
διδαχθώ/IJKMn
διεξαγόμενος/IQXdekn
δικαζόμενος/QXdjkn
δικαιούμενος/IQXdjkn
διοικούμενος/QXdjkn
διορισμένος/QXdjkn
διωκόμενος/IQXdjkn
δραστήριος/IQdekn
δυνάμενος/IQXdejkn
δυσβάστακτος/IQXen
δόλιος/IQen
δύστροπος/IQXdn
εγγλέζος/Qdkn
εγγύτερος/IQXdjkn
εγκαταστημένος/IQXkn
εγκρινόμενος/IQXen
ειδικευμένος/IQXdejkn
εικοσαήμερος/Xn
εισηγηθώ/IJMn
εκκαθαρισμένος/IQXdkn
εκμεταλλευτώ/JKMn
εκούσιος/IQdekn
εκπρόθεσμος/IQXdjkn
εκτιμώμενος/IQXdejkn
ελεγχόμενος/IQXdejkn
εμπεριεχόμενος/IXn
εμπρόθεσμος/IQXdkn
εμφύλιος/Iden
εναγόμενος/IQXdejkn
ενδεχόμενος/IQXdejkn
ενεργώ/FHIJKMein
ενιαύσιος/In
ενταγμένος/IQXdekn
εντοιχισμένος/IQXejn
εξάδελφος/dkn
εξαγόμενος/IQXdkn
εξακολουθώ/JKMin
εξελισσόμενος/Xdejkn
εξηγώ/JKMeiln
εξουσιοδοτημένος/IQXdejkn
εξόφθαλμος/IXn
επάλληλος/IQXdejkn
επίδεσμος/kn
επίλεκτος/IQXden
επίπεδος/IQXdekn
επίτροπος/dejkn
επανειλημμένος/HIQXekn
επερχόμενος/IQXdekn
επιβεβλημένος/IQXdekn
επιζήμιος/IQdejkn
επικαλούμενος/IQXdejkn
επικυρωμένος/IQXden
επισκεπτόμενος/QXkn
επιτήδειος/dkn
επιτόπιος/IQdejkn
επωφελέστερος/Xn
εργάσιμος/QXdekn
ερμηνευμένος/IQXdjn
ετερόρρυθμος/IQXdkn
ευδόκιμος/IQXdn
ευνοϊκότερος/IQXdejkn
ευτυχισμένος/IXdekn
εφαπτόμενος/IQXdekn
εφημέριος/dejkn
εύκολος/IQXdekn
εύρος/Qdejn
ζημιογόνος/Qdejn
ζωγράφος/Qdkn
ηλεκτρολόγος/Qdejkn
ημιυπόγειος/IQdn
θάνατος/kn
θαλαμηπόλος/Qdkn
θείος/IQdejkn
θεωρούμενος/IQXdejkn
θυμηθώ/JKMn
ιδιαίτερος/IQXdejkn
ιδιόρρυθμος/IXden
ιδρυόμενος/IQXden
ικανοποιημένος/IQXdkn
ιπτάμενος/IQXdejkn
ισχυριζόμενος/IQXdejkn
ισόγειος/IQdjn
ισότιμος/IQXdejkn
κάθοδος/n
κάτοικος/Qdejkn
κίνδυνος/Qdejkn
καθήμενος/IQXdn
καθορισμένος/IQXdejkn
κακόβουλος/IQXdn
καλλιεργήσιμος/IQXdejkn
καλοντυμένος/QXn
καλόγερος/Qden
καπετάνιος/dkn
καρόδρομος/dn
κατάμεστος/Xdn
καταγόμενος/IQXdjkn
καταργούμενος/IQXekn
κατασκευασμένος/IQXdejkn
κατερχόμενος/In
κατηγορούμενος/Xdkn
κατοχυρωμένος/IQXdekn
κείνος/IXdejkn
κερδοφόρος/IQen
κλήρος/IQdjkn
κληθώ/IJKMn
κληρούχος/Qdjkn
κορεσμένος/IXdn
κουρεμένος/n
κρατούμενος/IXdejkn
κρύος/Iden
κυκλοφορώ/FJMTein
κωδικοποιημένος/IQXdn
κόμματος/In
κύριος/IQdejkn
λανθασμένος/IQXdejkn
λεωφόρος/Qdkn
ληπτέος/IQdekn
λογιζόμενος/Xejkn
λύκος/Qdkn
μάχιμος/IXden
μέτοχος/Idekn
μίσθιος/IQdjkn
μακεδονομάχος/Qdkn
μαρκαδόρος/dkn
μεγάλος/IQXdejkn
μειωμένος/IQXdejkn
μεσαίος/IQden
μετέωρος/IQXden
μεταγραμμένος/IQXdn
μεταφερόμενος/IQXdejkn
μηνυτήριος/IQdn
μικρούτσικος/Qdn
μνημονευμένος/IQXdn
μονόχρωμος/IXdekn
μούλος/dekn
μπορώ/IJKMin
μόλος/IQdekn
μόσκος/dn
νήσος/Qdejkn
νευρολόγος/Qdkn
νικηφόρος/Iden
νομοθετημένος/IQXden
ντόμπρος/en
νόμος/Qdejkn
ξένιος/Idn
ξενοδόχος/Qdkn
οίνος/Qdekn
οδοντίατρος/dekn
οικοδόμος/Qdejkn
οικόσιτος/IQXdkn
ομοιόβαθμος/QXdjkn
ομόρρυθμος/IQXdjkn
οπίσθιος/IQdjkn
οργισμένος/IXdkn
οριζόμενος/IQXdejkn
ορμώμενος/n
πάγκοινος/n
πάππος/Qdekn
πέλαγος/In
παγκόσμιος/IQdejkn
παλαιότερος/IQXdekn
πανομοιότυπος/IQXden
παράγωγος/IQXdkn
παράμετρος/kn
παραγόμενος/IQXdejkn
παρακαμπτήριος/n
παραλειπόμενος/Idjkn
παραπονούμενος/QXdkn
παρεπόμενος/IQXdekn
παρόμοιος/IQdejkn
πεθαμένος/Idn
περίκλειστος/IXden
περιβαλλόμενος/Xjn
περιοριζόμενος/IQXdekn
περιφραγμένος/IQXden
πιεζόμενος/Xn
πλείστος/IQdejkn
πληροφορώ/IJKMehiln
πλουσιότατος/Xkn
πνιγμένος/IXn
ποιώ/Men
πολυώροφος/IQXdkn
πραγματοποιήσιμος/IXen
πρεσβύτερος/n
προβαλλόμενος/IQXdejkn
προδιαγραφόμενος/Qn
προθάλαμος/dkn
προκαλούμενος/Xdn
προνομιούχος/IQdejkn
προπορευόμενος/IQdjn
προσαυξανόμενος/IQXden
προσδιορισμένος/IQXdejn
προσλαμβανόμενος/IQdjkn
προσπαθώ/IJKMin
προσφερόμενος/IQXdekn
προτελευταίος/Idkn
πρωτοβάθμιος/IQdekn
πρόβολος/ekn
πρόεδρος/dekn
πρόξενος/Qkn
πρόσοδος/kn
πρότυπος/IQXdekn
πρώτος/IQXdejkn
πόθος/Qdekn
πόντος/Qdejkn
πύρινος/IXekn
ρωμαίος/Qdkn
ρύπος/Qdekn
σίδηρος/kn
σειώ/IJMen
σημαντικότερος/IQXdekn
σκάφος/Xdjn
σκεφτώ/JKMn
σκόπελος/n
σος/IQXdejkn
στάσιμος/IQXdekn
στίχος/Qdjkn
στείρος/IQdekn
στηριζόμενος/IQXdejkn
στροφαλοφόρος/dkn
συγκάτοικος/Qdkn
συγκρίσιμος/IQXekn
συμβαλλόμενος/IQXdjkn
συμβολαιογράφος/Qdjkn
συμπεφωνημένος/IQXdjn
συνάδελφος/Qdejkn
συναλλασσόμενος/Qdjkn
συνδεθώ/JKMn
συνεπαγόμενος/IQXden
συνεσταλμένος/n
συνιστώμενος/IQXdkn
συντασσόμενος/IQXdekn
συνυπεύθυνος/IQXdkn
συστημένος/Xden
σχιστόλιθος/Qn
σύγκλητος/n
σύμβουλος/dekn
σύνθετος/IQXdekn
σύριος/dekn
τέταρτος/IXdekn
ταλαντούχος/IQdn
τασσόμενος/IQXejkn
ταύρος/Qdkn
τελευταίος/HIQdejkn
τζίρος/dekn
τιμάριθμος/dn
τιμώμενος/Xdjn
τοκοφόρος/IQdn
τούρκικος/IXkn
τρίτος/IQXdejkn
τρεχούμενος/IQdn
τροχισμένος/n
τρόφιμος/Ikn
τσιμεντένιος/Iden
τόμος/Qdekn
τύπος/Qdejkn
υιοθετούμενος/QXn
υπέρμετρος/IQXdekn
υπαίθριος/IQdekn
υπαστυνόμος/Qdjn
υπερήφανος/IQXdkn
υπηρετώ/JKMein
υπογραφόμενος/IQXdjkn
υποκαθιστάμενος/QXdjkn
υπολογιζόμενος/IQXdejkn
υποπτέραρχος/jn
υποσχεθώ/IJKn
υποχρεωμένος/IQXdekn
υπόλοιπος/IQXdejkn
υψηλότερος/IQXdekn
φίλαθλος/Idkn
φαινόμενος/CIQXkn
φερόμενος/IQXdejkn
φιλελεύθερος/IQXdekn
φοβούμενος/Xekn
φυλακισμένος/Qdkn
φόντος/Idejkn
χάρτινος/IQXejn
χαμηλότερος/IQXdekn
χαρώ/FGJKMn
χερσαίος/IQdekn
χρειαστώ/JKMn
χρησιμοποιούντος/IQn
χρόνος/Qdejkn
χωρώ/FIJKMTmn
ψηφοφόρος/Qdjkn
ωριαίος/IQen
όγδοος/IQXdn
όμιλος/ekn
όποιος/IQdkn
όρος/QXdejkn
ύπαιθρος/n
ύστερος/IXn
